Massachusetts, session 194th, H394.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 295C of Chapter 94 of the Massachusetts General Laws, as
appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting after the first paragraph
the following paragraph:
If a retail dealer of motor fuel sells an identical grade of fuel at different prices per gallon
based on the customer’s method of payment, any sign displayed pursuant to the above paragraph
shall display each and every price per gallon for which a particular grade of fuel is sold and its
corresponding method of payment. Each price displayed on a sign for a particular grade of fuel
pursuant to this paragraph shall be the same size and presented in a substantially similar manner.
of 2

SECTION 2. Section 295D of Chapter 94 is hereby amended by inserting after the first
paragraph the following paragraph:
If a retail dealer of motor fuel sells an identical grade of fuel at different prices per gallon
based on the customer’s method of payment, any advertisement displayed pursuant to the above
paragraph shall display each and every price per gallon for which a particular grade of fuel is
sold and its corresponding method of payment. Each price advertised for a particular grade of
fuel pursuant to this paragraph shall be the same size and presented in a substantially similar
manner.
of 2